Washington statutes.
RCW 10.61.060

Reconsideration of verdict.

When there is a verdict of conviction in which it appears to the court that the jury have mistaken the law, the court may explain the reason for that opinion, and direct the jury to reconsider the verdict; and if after such reconsideration they return the same verdict it must be entered, but it shall be good cause for new trial. When there is a verdict of acquittal the court cannot require the jury to reconsider it.

[ 1891 c 28 s 78; Code 1881 s 1100; 1873 p 239 s 261; 1854 p 121 s 125; RRS s 2170.]